Tennessee statutes. Title 32 Wills
Part 1

Execution Generally

32-1-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Person” includes either man or woman, single or married; and

“Will” includes codicil.

Acts 1941, ch. 125, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8098.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-101.

Cross-References. Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, ch. 16, part 2.

Living wills, title 32, ch. 11.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 1, 2, 4-6, 11, 24, 82, 194, 224, 986, 1034.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-501 — 4-503, 4-505, 4-506.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 11.

Law Reviews.

Attorney v. Client — Privity, Malpractice, and the Lack of Respect for the Primacy of the Attorney-Client Relationship in Estate Planning, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 261 (2001).

Booby Traps in Drafting Wills (Raymond B. Witt, Jr.), 25 Tenn. L. Rev. 345 (1958).

Confused by tax reforms? Follow these 10 key rules for better estate planning in Tennessee (Dan W. Holbrook), 37 No. 8 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2001).

Effects of the Enactment of the 1941 Wills Act, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 447 (1943).

Ethics — Petty v. Privette: Exclusion of Attorney Liability in the Area of Estate Administration, 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 687 (1993).

Holographic Wills, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 440 (1943).

Some Aspects of Estate Planning In Tennessee (Alec Brock Stevenson), 2 Vand. L. Rev. 265 (1949).

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, IV. Transfers of Land (Beverly A. Rowlett), 48 Tenn. L. Rev. 72 (1981).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: A Fresh Look at State Asset Protection Trust Statutes, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1741 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Federalizing Principles of Donative Intent and Unanticipated Circumstances, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1931 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Is Federalization of Charity Law All Bad? What States Can Learn from the Internal Revenue Code, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1621 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, The Stored Communications Act and Digital Assets, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1729 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Destructive Federal Preemption of State Wealth Transfer Law in Beneficiary Designation Cases: Hillman Doubles Down on Egelhoff, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1665 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Disclaimers and Federalism, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1871 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Federal Visions of Private Family Support, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1835 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: In Search of the Probate Exception, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1533 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Introduction, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1531 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Probate Law Meets the Digital Age, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1697 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: The Creeping Federalization of Wealth-Transfer Law, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1635 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Unconstitutional Perpetual Trusts, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1769 (2014).

The Form of Wills (Ernst Rabel), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 533 (1953).

The Holographic Codicil (Ronald Lee Gilman), 18 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 60 (1982).

Uniform Wills Act of 1941, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 370 (1943).

Value definition clauses: The basics (Dan W. Holbrook), 37 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 33 (2001).

Wills — Attestation — Subscribing Witness Denies Facts of Attestation Clause, 20 Tenn. L. Rev. 396 (1948).

Wills, Estates and Trusts (William J. Bowe), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 1126 (1953).

Wills — Probate of Extrinsic Documents as Part of Testamentary Disposition, 28 Tenn. L. Rev. 593 (1961).

32-1-102. Persons qualified to make a will.

Any person of sound mind eighteen (18) years of age or older may make a will.

Acts 1941, ch. 125, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 8098.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-102.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 1, 4, 74, 79.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

The Form of Wills (Ernst Rabel), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 533 (1953).

32-1-103. Witnesses — Who may act.

Any person competent to be a witness generally in this state may act as attesting witness to a will.

No will is invalidated because attested by an interested witness, but any interested witness shall, unless the will is also attested by two (2) disinterested witnesses, forfeit so much of the provisions therein made for the interested witness as in the aggregate exceeds in value, as of the date of the testator's death, what the interested witness would have received had the testator died intestate.

No attesting witness is interested unless the will gives to the attesting witness some personal and beneficial interest.

Acts 1941, ch. 125, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 8098.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-103.

Cross-References. Affidavit of witnesses to prove will, §32-2-110.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 4, 7, 152, 209, 228, 236, 1032.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

The Form of Wills (Ernst Rabel), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 533 (1953).

Collateral References.

Amount or value of testamentary gift as affecting application of statute invalidating will attested by beneficially interested witness or limiting the benefit to such witness. 73 A.L.R.2d 1230.

Beneficiary under nuncupative will as witness thereto. 28 A.L.R.2d 796.

Competency of attesting witness who is not benefited by will except as it revokes an earlier will. 64 A.L.R. 1306.

Competency of named executor as subscribing witness to will. 74 A.L.R.2d 283.

Exception or proviso in statute invalidating testamentary gift to subscribing witness, saving the share witness would take in absence of will. 95 A.L.R.2d 1256.

Husband or wife of beneficiary as attesting witness to will. 25 A.L.R. 308.

Membership in, or other connection with, club, society, association or corporation as disqualifying one as witness to will in which it is beneficiary. 53 A.L.R. 211.

Necessity of laying foundation for opinion of attesting witness as to mental condition of testator or testatrix. 17 A.L.R.3d 503.

Necessity that attesting witness realize instrument was intended as will. 71 A.L.R.3d 877.

Proof, or possibility of proof, of will without testimony of attesting witness as affecting application of statute relating to invalidation of will, or of devise or legacy, where attesting witness is beneficiary under will. 133 A.L.R. 1286.

32-1-104. Will other than holographic or nuncupative — Signatures.

The execution of a will, other than a holographic or nuncupative will, must be by the signature of the testator and of at least two (2) witnesses as follows:

The testator shall signify to the attesting witnesses that the instrument is the testator's will and either:

The testator sign;

Acknowledge the testator's signature already made; or

At the testator's direction and in the testator's presence have someone else sign the testator's name; and

In any of the above cases the act must be done in the presence of two (2) or more attesting witnesses.

The attesting witnesses must sign:

In the presence of the testator; and

In the presence of each other.

For wills executed prior to July 1, 2016, to the extent necessary for the will to be validly executed, witness signatures affixed to an affidavit meeting the requirements of § 32-2-110 shall be considered signatures to the will, provided that:

The signatures are made at the same time as the testator signs the will and are made in accordance with subsection (a); and

The affidavit contains language meeting all the requirements of subsection (a).

If the witnesses signed the affidavit on the same day that the testator signed the will, it shall be presumed that the witnesses and the testator signed at the same time, unless rebutted by clear and convincing evidence. If, pursuant to this subsection (b), witness signatures on the affidavit are treated as signatures on the will, the affidavit shall not also serve as a self-proving affidavit under § 32-2-110. Nothing in this subsection (b) shall affect, eliminate, or relax the requirement in subsection (a) that the testator sign the will.

Acts 1941, ch. 125, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 8098.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-104; Acts 2016, ch. 843, § 1.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 843, § 2. April 19, 2016.

Cross-References. “Signature” defined, §1-3-105.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 4, 7, 10, 48, 192, 196, 202, 204, 205, 237, 1032, 1033.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-601.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 11, 14.

Law Reviews.

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

Probate—Taylor v. Holt: The Tennessee Court of Appeals Allows a Computer Generated Signature to Validate a Testamentary Will, (Chad Michael Ross), 35 U. Mem. L. Rev. 603 (2005).

Procedure and Evidence — 1955 Tennessee Survey (Edmund M. Morgan), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 1071 (1955).

The Form of Wills (Ernst Rabel), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 533 (1953).

Attorney General Opinions. Notarization of signatures of witnesses to living wills, OAG 98-032, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 32 (2/9/98).

32-1-105. Holographic will.

No witness to a holographic will is necessary, but the signature and all its material provisions must be in the handwriting of the testator and the testator's handwriting must be proved by two (2) witnesses.

Acts 1941, ch. 125, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 8098.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-105.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 4, 8, 210, 214, 216, 221, 222, 319.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 15, 55.

Law Reviews.

Decedent's Estates-In re Tipler: The Adoption of the Doctrine of Facts of Independent Significance in Tennessee, 31 U. Mem. L. Rev. 207 (2000).

Property Law — Wills — Effect of Lapsed Residuary Gifts in the State of Tennessee, 73 Tenn L. Rev. 711 (2006).

The Form of Wills (Ernst Rabel), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 533 (1953).

The Holographic Codicil (Ronald Lee Gilman), 18 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 60 (1982).

The Holographic Problem — The Case Against Holographic Wills (Richard Lewis Brown), 74 Tenn L. Rev. 93 (2006).

Wills — Holographic Codicil — Publication of An Invalid Typewritten Will, 8 Vand. L. Rev. 924 (1955).

Wills — Proving a Holographic Will, 19 Tenn. L. Rev. 856 (1947).

Wills, Trusts and Estates (Herein of Future Interests) — 1955 Tennessee Survey (W. J. Bowe), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 1158 (1955).

32-1-106. Nuncupative will.

A nuncupative will may be made only by a person in imminent peril of death, whether from illness or otherwise, and shall be valid only if the testator died as a result of the impending peril, and must be:

Declared to be the testator's will by the testator before two (2) disinterested witnesses;

Reduced to writing by or under the direction of one (1) of the witnesses within thirty (30) days after such declaration; and

Submitted for probate within six (6) months after the death of the testator.

The nuncupative will may dispose of personal property only and to an aggregate value not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), except that in the case of persons in active military, air or naval service in time of war the aggregate amount may be ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

A nuncupative will neither revokes nor changes an existing written will.

Acts 1941, ch. 125, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 8098.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-106.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 4, 5, 9, 231, 232, 234, 236, 237, 241, 244, 245, 316.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 20.

Law Reviews.

The Form of Wills (Ernst Rabel), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 533 (1953).

Wills — Implied Revocation by Divorce and Property Settlement, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 1081 (1955).

32-1-107. Foreign execution.

A will executed outside this state in a manner prescribed by §§32-1-101 —32-1-108, inclusive, or a written will executed outside this state in a manner prescribed by the law of the place of its execution or by the law of the testator's domicile at the time of its execution, shall have the same force and effect in this state as if executed in this state in compliance with those sections.

Acts 1941, ch. 125, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 8098.7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-107.

Cross-References. Probate of foreign wills, title 32, ch. 5.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 4, 53, 54, 56.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 11, 57.

Law Reviews.

Choice-of-Law Statutes (Robert A. Leflar), 44 Tenn. L. Rev. 951 (1977).

Conflict of Laws — 1955 Tennessee Survey (John W. Wade), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 964 (1955).

Conflict of Laws — 1959 Tennessee Survey (John W. Wade), 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1090 (1959).

The Form of Wills (Ernst Rabel), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 533 (1953).

Wills, Trusts and Estates (Herein of Future Interests) — 1955 Tennessee Survey (W. J. Bowe), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 1158 (1955).

32-1-108. Application of §§ 32-1-101 — 32-1-108.

Sections 32-1-101 — 32-1-108, inclusive, shall not apply to wills executed in this state on or before February 15, 1941, or to wills offered for ancillary probate in this state that have been admitted to probate in the state or country of the testator's domicile.

Acts 1941, ch. 125, § 8; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8098.8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-108.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 4-6.

32-1-109. Requisites of will executed on or before February 15, 1941.

No last will or testament executed on or before February 15, 1941, shall be good or sufficient to convey or give an estate in lands, unless written in the testator's lifetime, and signed by the testator, or by some other person in the testator's presence and by the testator's direction, and subscribed in the testator's presence by two (2) witnesses at least, neither of whom is interested in the devise of the lands.

Code 1858, § 2162 (deriv. Acts 1784 (Apr.), ch. 22, § 11); Shan., § 3895; Code 1932, § 8089; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-109.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 5, 7, 152, 191, 194, 196, 202, 209, 222, 237.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 9, 11, 12, 49, 59.

Law Reviews.

Some Suggested Legislation in the Field of Wills (W. Raymond Blackard), 14 Tenn. L. Rev. 381 (1937).

The Effects of the Enactment of the 1941 Wills Act, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 447 (1943).

32-1-110. Requisites of holographic will executed on or before February 15, 1941.

A paper writing, written on or before February 15, 1941, appearing to be the will of a deceased person, written by the deceased person, having the deceased person's name subscribed to it, or inserted in some part of it, and found, after the deceased person's death, among the deceased person's valuable papers, or lodged in the hands of another for safekeeping, shall be good and sufficient to give and convey lands, if the handwriting is generally known by the deceased person's acquaintances, and it is proved by at least three (3) credible witnesses that they verily believe the writing, and every part of it, to be in the deceased person's hand.

Code 1858, § 2163 (deriv. Acts 1784 (Oct.), ch. 10, § 5); Shan., § 3896; Code 1932, § 8090; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-110.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 8, 210, 217, 222, 319.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 15, 17.

Law Reviews.

Effects of the Enactment of the 1941 Wills Act, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 447 (1943).

Holographic Wills, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 440 (1943).

Holographic Wills — “Valuable Papers” as Place of Deposit, 16 Tenn. L. Rev. 754 (1940).

Some Suggested Legislation in the Field of Wills (W. Raymond Blackard), 14 Tenn. L. Rev. 381 (1937).

Wills — Proving a Holographic Will, 19 Tenn. L. Rev. 856 (1947).

Wills — Requirements for Holographic Wills, 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 256 (1939).

32-1-111. Married women's power to dispose of property by will.

Married women, after February 15, 1941, may dispose of their property by will according to §§ 32-1-101 — 32-1-108.

Wills executed on or before February 15, 1941, by married women twenty-one (21) years of age or over, are valid to dispose of their realty or personalty, legal or equitable, in as complete manner as if executed by femes sole.

Code 1858, § 2168 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 180, § 4); Acts 1869-1870, ch. 99, §§ 1, 6; Shan., § 3901; mod. Code 1932, § 8098; modified; Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-111.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 81, 82, 90, 812.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1253 (1961).

Some Suggested Legislation in the Field of Wills (W. Raymond Blackard), 14 Tenn. L. Rev. 381 (1937).

Wills — Implied Revocation by Divorce and Property Settlement, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 1081 (1955).

32-1-112. Deposit of will with probate court.

With respect to a testator who is living, any will in writing, being enclosed in a sealed wrapper, and having endorsed thereon the name of the testator, the testator's place of residence and the testator's social security number or driver license number, if any, and the day when, and the person by whom, it is delivered, may be deposited by the person making the will, or by any person for the person making the will, with the court exercising probate jurisdiction in the county where the testator lives. With respect to a deceased testator, any will in writing may be deposited by any person with the court exercising probate jurisdiction in the county where the testator lived at the time of the testator's death. The preceding provisions shall apply only if the clerk of the probate court has a secure vault or safe for the safe keeping of the will. The probate court shall receive and safely and securely keep any such will, and give a certificate of the deposit thereof, and for this service shall charge a fee of five dollars ($5.00).

The will shall, during the lifetime of the testator, be delivered only to the testator, or to some person authorized by the testator by an order in writing, duly proved by the oath of a subscribing witness. Any will that is deposited after the death of the testator shall be delivered only to a person named in the will as executor, to a next of kin of the testator, or to any other person so authorized by law or court order.

After the death of the testator and upon submission of a death certificate or other satisfactory evidence of death as determined by the judge exercising probate jurisdiction, the will shall be opened by the court in open session and shall be made public.

After the death of the testator, should jurisdiction of the will for probate belong to any other court, upon request of the executor named in the will or any other person interested in its provisions, the will shall be forwarded by certified or registered mail to the other court or delivered to the executor, or to some other trusted person interested in the provisions of the will, to be presented for probate in the other court.

The deposit of a written will as provided by this section shall not constitute a probate of the will nor, if deposited prior to a testator's death, preclude the testator from revoking it, amending it, withdrawing it, or depositing a substitute will, it being the intent and purpose of this section to provide only a place of depository for written wills, a procedure for depositing written wills, and a delivery of written wills for probate upon the death of the testator.

If, after the death of the testator, a later will is discovered that supersedes a will deposited as provided in this section and the later will is duly admitted to probate, or if a will deposited as provided in this section is for any other reason invalidated, following the administration of the estate of the testator by or on whose behalf the will is deposited, and the settlement of the estate, upon order by the judge of the probate court wherein the will was deposited, the will shall be destroyed.

Acts 1976, ch. 676, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 32-701 — 37-704; Acts 1989, ch. 364, § 2; 1999, ch. 507, § 1.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 5, 316.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

32-1-113. Mailing or delivery of will to personal representative or clerk of court.

Any person or corporation who has possession of or discovers a written instrument purporting to be the last will and testament of a decedent shall mail or deliver that instrument to the personal representative named in the instrument as soon as the person or corporation has knowledge of the death, and a photographic copy of the instrument shall be mailed or delivered to the clerk of the court having probate jurisdiction in the county of the decedent's residence.

If the personal representative, or the personal representative's address, is not known, is deceased or is not eligible to serve;

If the instrument does not name a personal representative;

If the personal representative declines to serve; or

If it appears that there is no estate that will require administration;

then the person having possession of the original instrument shall mail or deliver it to the clerk.

The receipt by the personal representative or the clerk shall relieve the person of further responsibility as to possession of the instrument.

The clerk of the court shall have no responsibility to perform any acts regarding the probate of the will and shall not accept any claims for filing against the estate unless and until the personal representative or other interested party files proper pleadings to initiate such an action.

Acts 1985, ch. 139, § 3; 1989, ch. 364, § 3.